Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Treason and Related Offenses

§ 3401.
Definition and punishment of treason.

A person owing allegiance to this State, who levies war or conspires to levy war against the same, or adheres to the enemies thereof, giving them aid and comfort, within the State or elsewhere, shall be guilty of treason against this State and shall suffer the punishment of death.

§ 3402.
Place of trial; testimony.

Such person may be tried in any county in the State, but shall not be convicted except upon testimony equivalent to two witnesses to the same overt act of treason of which he or she stands indicted, or upon confession in open court.

§ 3403.
Misprision of treason.

A person owing allegiance to this State, knowing such treason to have been committed, or knowing of the intent of a person to commit such treason, who does not, within 14 days from the time of having such knowledge, give information thereof to the Governor of the State, to one of the Justices of the Supreme Court, a Superior judge, or a justice of the peace, shall be guilty of misprision of treason and shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years nor less than five years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 2019, No. 77, § 15, eff. June 19, 2019.

§ 3404.
Powers of arrest; proceedings.

A district judge, sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, or police officer having notice or knowledge, or who suspects that a person has committed treason or an offense mentioned in sections 3481-3485 of this title, shall arrest such person without warrant and take him or her before a Justice of the Supreme Court or a Superior judge, who shall have authority to commit such person to jail, or may bind him or her over with sufficient sureties by way of recognizance, for his appearance before the Superior Court of the county in which the offense was committed, to answer to such information or indictment as may be brought against him or her.
Section 7173 of this title shall apply to such a Justice of the Supreme Court and to such a Superior judge.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 47.

§ 3405.
Promotion of anarchy.

A person who by speech or directly or indirectly by exhibition, distribution, or promulgation of any written or printed document or paper or pictorial representation, shall advocate, advise, counsel, or incite unlawful assault upon, or the killing of a public official, or the unlawful destruction of property, or the overthrow by force or violence of the government of the State, or who, at any meeting or in the presence of more than three persons in any place or in any manner, shall advise, advocate, or counsel the violation of or unlawful refusal to obey a law of the State respecting the preservation of the peace and the protection of life or property shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.